Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7380.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 17-19 of the General Laws entitled "Conduct of Election and Voting
Equipment, and Supplies" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
17-19-24.4. Ranked choice voting prohibition.
(a) In all elections, including primary elections, for any local, state, or federal public office,
the following shall be prohibited:
(1) Voting systems that permit a voter to vote for more than one candidate for the same
office;
(2) Voting systems that permit a voter to rank multiple candidates for the same office; and
(3) Voting systems that reallocate a voter's vote for one candidate to another candidate for
the same office.
(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent a locality from holding at-large
elections or multi-member district elections, as long as voters have one vote per position and no
votes are transferred between candidates.
(c) Any existing or future ordinance by any political subdivision of this state which is in
conflict with this section is void.
(d) Any election for any public office in this state conducted under a voting system
prohibited by subsection (a) of this section is void, and no candidate shall be elected under such a
system.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004422
========
LC004422 - Page 2 of 3